Utah statutes.
19-6-307.   Hazardous Substances Mitigation Fund -- Uses.
(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund entitled the
"Hazardous Substances Mitigation Fund."
(2)  The fund consists of monies generated from the following revenue sources:
(a)  any voluntary contributions received for the cleanup of hazardous
substances facilities;
(b)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature; and
(c)  monies received by the state under Section 19-6-310 and Section 19-6-316.
(3) (a)  The fund shall earn interest.
(b)  All interest earned on fund monies shall be deposited into the fund.
(4)  The executive director may use fund monies to:
(a)  take emergency action as provided in Sections 19-6-309 and 19-6-310;
(b)  conduct remedial investigations as provided in Sections 19-6-314 through
19-6-316;
(c)  pay the amount required by the federal government as the state's portion
of the cost of cleanups under authority of CERCLA, as appropriated by the
Legislature for that purpose; and
(d)  pay the amount required by the federal government as the state's portion
of the cost of cleanups under 42 U.S.C. 6991 et seq., the Leaking Underground
Storage Tank Trust Fund, as appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.
